Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.802

Advisory groups—Travel—Compensation.

In addition to any board, commission, council, committee, or other similar group established by statute or executive order, the superintendent of public instruction may appoint advisory groups on subject matters within the superintendent's responsibilities or as may be required by any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the federal department. The advisory groups shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the superintendent may determine.

Members of advisory groups under the authority of the superintendent may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Except as provided in this section or as authorized by RCW 43.03.220, members of advisory groups under the authority of the superintendent are volunteering their services and are not eligible for compensation. A person is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of the group if the person (1) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in nature, as a certificated employee of a local school district; (2) is participating as part of their employment with the local school district; and (3) the meeting or duties are performed outside the period in which school days as defined by *RCW 28A.150.030 are conducted. The superintendent may reimburse local school districts for substitute certificated employees to enable members to meet or perform duties on school days. A person is eligible to receive compensation from federal funds in an amount to be determined by personal service contract for groups required by federal law.

[ 2022 c 245 s 4; 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 53.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.150.030 expired September 1, 2011. See RCW 28A.150.203.

Findings—2022 c 245: See note following RCW 43.03.220.